Oklahoma, session 2026, HB2696.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 51 O.S. 2021, Section 24A.16, as
amended by Section 1, Chapter 86, O.S.L. 2024 (51 O.S. Supp. 2024,
Section 24A.16), is amended to read as follows:
Section 24A.16. A. Except as set forth in subsection B of this
section, public educational institutions and their employees may
keep confidential:
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB2696 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

1. Individual student records;
2. Teacher lesson plans, tests and other teaching material;
3. Personal communications concerning individual students; and
4. Any contract for use of a student athlete’s name, image, or
likeness disclosed to a postsecondary institution pursuant to the
Student Athlete Name, Image and Likeness Rights Act.
B. If kept, statistical information not identified with a
particular student and directory information shall be open for
inspection and copying. Except as provided in subsection C of this
section, each educational institution may choose to designate
specific information which shall be classified as directory
information for students attending the educational institution. In
accordance with the Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act,
Section 1232g of Title 20 of the United States Code and Part 99 of
Title 34 of the Code of Federal Regulations, “directory information”
includes a student’s name, address, telephone listing, date and
place of birth, major field of study, participation in officially
recognized activities and sports, weight and height of members of
athletic teams, dates of attendance, degrees and awards received,
and the most recent previous educational institution attended by the
student. Any educational agency or institution making public
directory information shall give public notice of the categories of
information which it has designated as directory information with
respect to each student attending the institution or agency and
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB2696 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

shal l allow a reasonable period of time after the notice has been
given for a parent or guardian to inform the institution or agency
that any or all of the information designated should not be released
without prior consent of the parent or guardian or the student if
the student is eighteen (18) years of age or older.
C. All educational agencies or institutions which are not the
primary custodians of student directory information of students
attending the educational institution, but which are allowed to
access the information for educational purposes, shall be prohibited
from releasing or selling any or all student directory information
unless disclosure is authorized by the Family Educational Rights and
Privacy Act, Section 1232g of Title 20 of the United States Code and
Part 99 of Title 34 of the Code of Federal Regulations, or Section
3-168 of Title 70 of the Oklahoma Statutes.
D. A public school district may release individual student
records for the current or previous school year to a school district
at which the student was previously enrolled for purposes of
evaluating educational programs and school effectiveness.
SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 51 O.S. 2021, Section 24A.28, as
amended by Section 1, Chapter 325, O.S.L. 2023 (51 O.S. Supp. 2025,
Section 24A.28), is amended to read as follows:
Section 24A.28. A. The following information may be kept
confidential:

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB2696 SFLR Page 3
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

1. Investigative evidence of a plan or scheme to commit an act
of terrorism;
2. Assessments of the vulnerability of government facilities or
public improvements to an act of terrorism and work papers directly
related to preparing the assessment of vulnerability;
3. Records including details for deterrence or prevention of or
protection from an act or threat of an act of terrorism;
4. Records including details for response or remediation after
an act of terrorism;
5. Information technology of a public body or public official
but only if the information specifically identifies:
a. design or functional schematics that demonstrate the
relationship or connections between devices or
systems,
b. system configuration information,
c. security monitoring and response equipment placement
and configuration,
d. specific location or placement of systems, components,
or devices,
e. system identification numbers, names, or connecting
circuits,
f. business continuity and disaster planning, or response
plans, or

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB2696 SFLR Page 4
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

g. investigative information directly related to security
penetrations or denial of services; or
h. cybersecurity risk assessments, vulnerability scans,
penetration testing results, incident response plans
and reports, forensic reports, security audit reports,
system or network logs, and cyber threat intelligence
shared with other government agencies or through
recognized information sharing organizations, to the
extent such records could reasonably be expected to
facilitate unauthorized access to or disruption of
information systems;
6. Investigation evidence of an act of terrorism that has
already been committed;
7. Records received, maintained, or generated by the Oklahoma
Office of Homeland Security which include confidential private
business information or an individual’s private records;
8. Records received by the Oklahoma Office of Homeland Security
from the United States Department of Homeland Security or records
maintained or generated by the Oklahoma Office of Homeland Security
involving the United States Department of Homeland Security;
9. Records received, maintained, or generated by the Department
of Environmental Quality that contain information regarding sources
of radiation in quantities determined by the United States Nuclear
Regulatory Commission to be significant to public health and safety,
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB2696 SFLR Page 5
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

by w homever possessed, whether in transit or at fixed sites, when
the information could reasonably be expected to have an adverse
effect on the health and safety of the public by increasing the
likelihood of theft, diversion, or sabotage of the radiation sources
or facilities. The information may include but is not limited to
information:
a. from or relating to radioactive material licensees
identifying the exact location of the radioactive
material,
b. describing how the radioactive material is secured
from unauthorized removal or access when it is in
storage,
c. describing the control and maintenance of constant
surveillance of the radioactive material when it is
not in storage,
d. describing specific policies and procedures for
actions to physically protect the radioactive
material,
e. identifying possession limits or actual inventories of
radionuclides,
f. containing or describing assessments or analyses that
could reveal vulnerabilities,
g. identifying specific locations of safety and security
equipment,
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB2696 SFLR Page 6
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

h. describing emergency planning, emergency response and
fire protection, and
i. containing or describing other information that could
reasonably be expected to be useful to persons with
malevolent intent;
10. The names of school district personnel who have been
designated to carry a firearm pursuant to Section 5-149.2 of Title
70 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
11. Information technology of the State Election Board or a
county election board which is determined jointly by the Secretary
of the State Election Board and the State Chief Information Officer
to be technology that could reasonably be expected to be useful to
persons with intent to interfere with the conduct of an election,
voter registration, or other election processes;
12. Records received, maintained, or generated by the Oklahoma
Municipal Power Authority established pursuant to Section 24-101 et
seq. of Title 11 of the Oklahoma Statutes and in its role as an
electric utility regulated by the federal government, related to
security plans and procedures including, but not limited to,
cybersecurity matters; and
13. Risk and vulnerability assessments of school districts
conducted pursuant to Section 2 of this act including
recommendations to increase security on school district property and

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB2696 SFLR Page 7
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

work papers directly related to preparation of the risk and
vulnerability assessments.
B. The following information shall not be kept confidential:
1. Records related to federal grants administered by the
Oklahoma Office of Homeland Security or the Department of
Environmental Quality;
2. Records related to the receipt and expenditure of public
funds; or
3. Records related to the financial performance or financial
administration of the Oklahoma Office of Homeland Security or the
Department of Environmental Quality.
C. For the purposes of this section, the term “terrorism” means
any act encompassed by the definitions set forth in Section 1268.1
of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes.
D. 1. Public educational institutions may keep confidential
campus security plans. An institution or agency may in its
discretion release information contained in or related to the campus
security plan in order to design or implement the plan.
2. Nothing in this subsection shall preclude an institution or
agency within The Oklahoma State System of Higher Education from
collecting and releasing information relating to campus crime
statistics and campus security policies as is required pursuant to
the Jeanne Clery Disclosure of Campus Security Policy and Campus
Crime Statistics Act, 20 U.S.C. 1092(f).
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB2696 SFLR Page 8
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

3. For purposes of this subsection, “campus security plan”
shall include, but is not limited to, prevention and response
procedures to and notification procedures for perceived or actual
security threats and incidents on or impacting the campus.
SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON JUDICIARY
April 7, 2026 - DO PASS


















SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB2696 SFLR Page 9
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)